Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 6 Registration Fees

31-6-1.
Amount of registration and miscellaneous fees.

The following registration fees shall be paid to the division of motor vehicles for the registration of motor vehicles, trailers, semi-trailers, and school buses subject to registration for each year of registration:

For the registration of every automobile, when equipped with pneumatic tires, the gross weight of which is not more than four thousand pounds (4,000 lbs.): thirty dollars ($30.00).

For the registration of every motor truck or tractor when equipped with pneumatic tires, the gross weight of which is not more than four thousand pounds (4,000 lbs.): thirty-four dollars ($34.00).

For the registration of every automobile, motor truck or tractor, when equipped with pneumatic tires, the gross weight of which is:

More than four thousand pounds (4,000 lbs.), but not more than five thousand pounds (5,000 lbs.): forty dollars ($40.00);

More than five thousand pounds (5,000 lbs.), but not more than six thousand pounds (6,000 lbs.): forty-eight dollars ($48.00);

More than six thousand pounds (6,000 lbs.), but not more than seven thousand pounds (7,000 lbs.): fifty-six dollars ($56.00);

More than seven thousand pounds (7,000 lbs.), but not more than eight thousand pounds (8,000 lbs.): sixty-four dollars ($64.00);

More than eight thousand pounds (8,000 lbs.), but not more than nine thousand pounds (9,000 lbs.): seventy dollars ($70.00);

More than nine thousand pounds (9,000 lbs.), but not more than ten thousand pounds (10,000 lbs.): seventy-eight dollars ($78.00);

More than ten thousand pounds (10,000 lbs.), but not more than twelve thousand pounds (12,000 lbs.): one hundred six dollars ($106);

More than twelve thousand pounds (12,000 lbs.), but not more than fourteen thousand pounds (14,000 lbs.): one hundred twenty-four dollars ($124);

More than fourteen thousand pounds (14,000 lbs.), but not more than sixteen thousand pounds (16,000 lbs.): one hundred forty dollars ($140);

More than sixteen thousand pounds (16,000 lbs.), but not more than eighteen thousand pounds (18,000 lbs.): one hundred fifty-eight dollars ($158);

More than eighteen thousand pounds (18,000 lbs.), but not more than twenty thousand pounds (20,000 lbs.): one hundred seventy-six dollars ($176);

More than twenty thousand pounds (20,000 lbs.), but not more than twenty-two thousand pounds (22,000 lbs.): one hundred ninety-four dollars ($194);

More than twenty-two thousand pounds (22,000 lbs.), but not more than twenty-four thousand pounds (24,000 lbs.): two hundred ten dollars ($210);

More than twenty-four thousand pounds (24,000 lbs.), but not more than twenty-six thousand pounds (26,000 lbs.): two hundred thirty dollars ($230);

More than twenty-six thousand pounds (26,000 lbs.), but not more than twenty-eight thousand pounds (28,000 lbs.): two hundred ninety-six dollars ($296);

More than twenty-eight thousand pounds (28,000 lbs.), but not more than thirty thousand pounds (30,000 lbs.): three hundred sixteen dollars ($316);

More than thirty thousand pounds (30,000 lbs.), but not more than thirty-two thousand pounds (32,000 lbs.): four hundred and twenty-two dollars ($422);

More than thirty-two thousand pounds (32,000 lbs.), but not more than thirty-four thousand pounds (34,000 lbs.): four hundred and forty-eight dollars ($448);

More than thirty-four thousand pounds (34,000 lbs.), but not more than thirty-six thousand pounds (36,000 lbs.): four hundred and seventy-six dollars ($476);

More than thirty-six thousand pounds (36,000 lbs.), but not more than thirty-eight thousand pounds (38,000 lbs.): five hundred and two dollars ($502);

More than thirty-eight thousand pounds (38,000 lbs.), but not more than forty thousand pounds (40,000 lbs.): five hundred and twenty-eight dollars ($528);

More than forty thousand pounds (40,000 lbs.), but not more than forty-two thousand pounds (42,000 lbs.): five hundred and fifty-four dollars ($554);

More than forty-two thousand pounds (42,000 lbs.), but not more than forty-six thousand pounds (46,000 lbs.): six hundred and eight dollars ($608);

More than forty-six thousand pounds (46,000 lbs.), but not more than fifty thousand pounds (50,000 lbs.): six hundred and sixty dollars ($660);

More than fifty thousand pounds (50,000 lbs.), but not more than fifty-four thousand pounds (54,000 lbs.): seven hundred and twelve dollars ($712);

More than fifty-four thousand pounds (54,000 lbs.), but not more than fifty-eight thousand pounds (58,000 lbs.): seven hundred and sixty-eight dollars ($768);

More than fifty-eight thousand pounds (58,000 lbs.), but not more than sixty-two thousand pounds (62,000 lbs.): eight hundred and sixteen dollars ($816);

More than sixty-two thousand pounds (62,000 lbs.), but not more than sixty-six thousand pounds (66,000 lbs.): eight hundred and seventy-six dollars ($876);

More than sixty-six thousand pounds (66,000 lbs.), but not more than seventy thousand pounds (70,000 lbs.): nine hundred and twenty-four dollars ($924);

More than seventy thousand pounds (70,000 lbs.), but not more than seventy-four thousand pounds (74,000 lbs.): nine hundred and seventy-two dollars ($972);

Over seventy-four thousand pounds (74,000 lbs.): nine hundred and seventy-two dollars ($972), plus twenty-four dollars ($24.00) per two thousand pounds (2,000 lbs.) gross weight.

For the registration of every semi-trailer to be used with a truck-tractor, as defined in §

31-1-4(f)

, shall be as follows: an annual fee of twelve dollars ($12.00) for a one-year registration; for multi-year registrations the fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) for a five-year (5) registration; and eighty dollars ($80.00) for an eight-year (8) registration. However, when in use, the weight of the resulting semi-trailer unit and its maximum carrying capacity shall not exceed the gross weight of the original semi-trailer unit from which the gross weight of the tractor was determined. A registration certificate and registration plate shall be issued for each semi-trailer so registered. There shall be no refund of payment of such fee, except that when a plate is returned prior to ninety (90) days before the effective date of that year’s registration, the pro rate amount, based on the unused portion of the multi-year registration plate period at time of surrender, shall be refunded. A multi-year semi-trailer registration may be transferred to another semi-trailer subject to the provisions and fee set forth in §

31-6-11

. Thirty percent (30%) of the semi-trailer registration fee shall be retained by the division of motor vehicles to defray the costs of implementation of the international registration plan (IRP) and fleet registration section.

For the registration of every automobile, motor truck, or tractor, when equipped with other than pneumatic tires, there shall be added to the above gross weight fees a charge of ten cents (10¢) for each one hundred pounds (100 lbs.) of gross weight.

For the registration of every public bus, the rates provided for motor vehicles for hire plus two dollars ($2.00) for each passenger that bus is rated to carry, the rating to be determined by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles.

For the registration of every motorcycle, or motor-driven cycle, thirteen dollars ($13.00). Three dollars ($3.00) from that sum shall be turned over to the department of education to assist in the payment of the cost of the motorcycle driver’s education program as enumerated in §

31-10.1-1.1

.

For the registration of every trailer, not including semi-trailers used with a truck-tractor as defined in §

31-1-4(d)

, with a gross weight of three thousand pounds (3,000 lbs.) or less, five dollars ($5.00). Trailers with a gross weight of more than three thousand pounds (3,000 lbs.) shall be assessed a registration fee of one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) per thousand pounds (1,000 lbs.).

The annual registration fee for a motor vehicle, commonly described as a boxcar and/or locomotive, and used only by La Societe Des 40 Hommes et 8 Chevaux for civic demonstration, parades, convention purposes, or social welfare work, shall be two dollars ($2.00).

For the registration of every motor vehicle, trailer, or semi-trailer owned by any department or agency of any city or town or district, provided the name of the city or town or district or state department or agency owning the same shall be plainly printed on two (2) sides of the vehicle, two dollars ($2.00).

For the registration of motor vehicles used for racing, fifteen dollars ($15.00).

For every duplicate registration certificate, seventeen dollars ($17.00).

For every certified copy of a registration certificate or application, ten dollars ($10.00).

For every certificate assigning a special identification number or mark as provided in §

31-3-37

, one dollar ($1.00).

For every replacement of number plates or additional pair of number plates, without changing the number, thirty dollars ($30.00).

For the registration of every farm vehicle, used in farming as provided in §

31-3-31

: ten dollars ($10.00).

For the registration of antique motor vehicles, five dollars ($5.00).

For the registration of a suburban vehicle, when used as a pleasure vehicle and the gross weight of which is not more than four thousand pounds (4,000 lbs.), the same rates as charged in subsection (1) of this section shall be applicable and when used as a commercial vehicle and the gross weight of which is not more than four thousand pounds (4,000 lbs.), the same rates as provided in subsection (2) of this section shall be applicable. The rates in subsection (3) of this section shall be applicable when the suburban vehicle has a gross weight of more than four thousand pounds (4,000 lbs.), regardless of the use of the vehicle.

For the registration of every motor bus that is used exclusively under contract with a political subdivision or school district of the state for the transportation of school children, twenty-five dollars ($25); provided that the motor bus may also be used for the transportation of persons to and from church and Sunday school services, and for the transportation of children to and from educational or recreational projects sponsored by a city or town or by any association or organization supported wholly or in part by public or private donations for charitable purposes, without the payment of additional registration fee.

For the registration of every motorized bicycle, ten dollars ($10.00).

For the registration of every motorized tricycle, ten dollars ($10.00).

For the replacement of number plates with a number change, twenty dollars ($20.00).

For the initial issuance and each reissuance of fully reflective plates, as required by §§

31-3-10

,

31-3-32

, and

31-3-33

, an additional eight dollars ($8.00); provided, however, for the initial issuance of new license plates as required by §

31-3-33

(c) that feature the 2022 approved design, the fee shall be waived when the plate is issued for a vehicle with an existing registration.

For the issuance of a trip permit under the International Registration Plan, twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per vehicle. The division of motor vehicles is authorized to issue seventy-two-hour (72) trip permits for vehicles required to be registered in the International Registration Plan that have not been apportioned with the state of Rhode Island.

For the issuance of a hunter’s permit under the International Registration Plan, twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per vehicle. The division of motor vehicles is authorized to issue hunter’s permits for motor vehicles based in the state of Rhode Island and otherwise required to be registered in the International Registration Plan. These permits are valid for thirty (30) days.

For the registration of a specially adapted motor vehicle necessary to transport a family member with a disability for personal, noncommercial use, a fee of thirty dollars ($30.00) assessed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 14, § 1; P.L. 1951, ch. 2826, § 11; P.L. 1952, ch. 2937, § 7; P.L. 1953 (1st s. s.), ch. 3236, § 2; P.L. 1954, ch. 3378, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-6-1

; P.L. 1958, ch. 75, § 1; P.L. 1960, ch. 62, § 1; P.L. 1960, ch. 75, § 6; P.L. 1963, ch. 96, § 1; P.L. 1964, ch. 214, § 3; P.L. 1969, ch. 174, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 134, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 213, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 64, § 4; P.L. 1978, ch. 377, § 3; P.L. 1981, ch. 327, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 86, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 367, § 2; P.L. 1986, ch. 167, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 408, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 13, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 29, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 135, § 2; P.L. 1995, ch. 373, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 19, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 16, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 22, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 77, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 137, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 394, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 24, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 7, § 10; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 9, § 5; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 9, § 4; P.L. 2017, ch. 302, art. 4, § 3; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 7, § 3; P.L. 2022, ch. 231, art. 6, § 2, effective June 27, 2022.

31-6-1.1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 9, § 5; Repealed by P.L. 2017, ch. 302, art. 4, § 4, effective August 3, 2017.

31-6-2.
Computation of gross weight.

For the purpose of computing fees based on gross weight, the gross weight shall, in the case of motor trucks, tractors, trailers, or semi-trailers, be the weight of the vehicle in pounds plus the weight of the maximum load to be carried. In the case of passenger motor vehicles, the gross weight shall be the weight of the vehicle plus the sum of the adult seating capacity multiplied by one hundred fifty pounds (150 lbs.).

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 14, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-6-2

; P.L. 1984, ch. 418, § 1.

31-6-3.
Gross weight of tractors to be used with semi-trailers.

In computing the fees for the registration of every tractor to be used in combination with a semi-trailer, the gross weight shall include the weight of the tractor, the weight of the semi-trailer to be used with it, and the weight of the maximum load to be carried.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 14, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-6-3

; P.L. 1969, ch. 173, § 2; P.L. 1984, ch. 418, § 1.

31-6-4.
Fees payable by jitney operators in interstate commerce.

Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary contained in this chapter or in any other provision of the laws of this state, the administrator of the division of motor vehicles may issue certificates of registration and plates for all the jitneys owned or operated by any carrier of passengers for hire operating jitneys in interstate commerce in the state of Rhode Island and from every state contiguous to it, pursuant to the authority granted by the Interstate Commerce Commission, at a rate equal to the sum represented by the registration fee for a single jitney provided in §

31-6-1

, multiplied by the average number of jitneys, as determined by the administrator of the division of motor vehicles, required by the applicant to operate the maximum number of schedules provided in the published schedules of the applicant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 14, § 1; P.L. 1954, ch. 3378, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-6-4

.

31-6-5.
Reduced fees for portion of year.

If an application for registration of any motor vehicle, trailer, or semi-trailer shall be made in the first quarter of the year appropriate to the individual’s registration expiration, or in the second quarter or the third quarter in any year, the fee for registration shall be three-fourths (3/4), two-fourths (2/4), or one-fourth (1/4) respectively of the fee required for a full year.

The provisions of this section shall not apply in the case of the registration of motor vehicles used for racing, or for motor vehicles, trailers, or semi-trailers owned by any department or agency of the state of Rhode Island, or by any city, town, or district of this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 14, § 2; P.L. 1951, ch. 2826, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

31-6-5

; P.L. 1981, ch. 327, § 1.

31-6-6.
Vehicles exempt from fees.

No registration fee is required for the registration of motor-driven equipment owned by the following:

American Legion bloodmobile;

American National Red Cross or any of its chapters within this state;

American Red Cross, Jamestown chapter ambulance;

American Red Cross, Tiverton chapter ambulance;

American Red Cross, Warwick chapter ambulances;

Animal Rescue League of Southern Rhode Island truck used for rescue work;

Burrillville Ambulance Corps ambulance;

Burrillville American Legion Post No. 17 ambulances;

Civil Air Patrol, Rhode Island wing motor vehicle equipment;

East Greenwich Ambulance Association ambulances;

East Greenwich American Legion Post No. 15 (incorporated February 20, 1933) ambulances;

East Tiverton Volunteer Fire Department Rescue Squad of Tiverton (a non-business corporation, incorporated February 16, 1955) equipment, that motor vehicle being a rescue truck equipped with resuscitators, underwater equipment, emergency lighting units with generators, and various other devices needed to effect rescue and save lives and property under any emergency and used for this purpose only;

Foster Ambulance Association ambulances;

Georgiaville Volunteer Fire Company, Smithfield town ambulance;

Glocester Ambulance Corps, Inc. ambulance;

Hianloland Farms Fire Engine Company of West Greenwich RI, (a non-business corporation, incorporated November 15, 1940) equipment;

Hope Valley Ambulance Squad, Inc., ambulances and rescue trucks;

Hope Valley volunteer fire company ambulances;

Hope Valley volunteer fire company crash-truck;

Hospital ambulances;

Johnston Hose Company No. 1 ambulance;

Johnston Hose Company No. 3 ambulance;

Lake Mishnock Volunteer Fire Company Rescue Squad, West Greenwich, Rhode Island;

Le Baron C. Colt Memorial Ambulance, Inc. (with plates designated “car 5,” providing ambulance service to any resident of the town of Bristol, incorporated October 17, 1923, as a charitable corporation) ambulance;

Narragansett Rescue Corps, Inc., ambulance;

North Kingstown Ambulance Association, Inc. (incorporated July 23, 1943, as a charitable corporation) ambulance;

North Providence Chamber of Commerce Ambulance Service, Inc. (incorporated March 15, 1947, as a charitable corporation) ambulance;

North Smithfield Ambulance Association ambulances;

North Smithfield Ambulance and Rescue Association rescue wagon and rescue boat trailer;

Northern Lincoln Volunteer Ambulance Corps ambulance;

Northern Rhode Island Radio Emergency Associated Citizens Teams (REACT) rescue truck and other emergency vehicles;

Public health league or district nursing association in any city or town in this state;

Rhode Island American Legion, (incorporated January 29, 1941) first district ambulance committee of the department ambulances;

Rhode Island Association of Retarded Citizens, Northern Rhode Island Chapter motor vehicles used for the transportation of retarded citizens;

Rhode Island Association of Retarded Citizens, South County Chapter motor vehicles used for the transportation of retarded children;

Rhode Island Association for Retarded Children, Westerly-Chariho Chapter motor vehicles to be used for the transportation of retarded children;

Rhode Island Society for the Prevention of Cruelty to Animals’ motor vehicles;

Rhode Island Lions Sight Foundation, Inc., vehicle;

Rhode Island state departments’ or agencies’ motor vehicles, trailers, or semi-trailers;

Roy Carpenter’s beach volunteer fire department, Matunuck ambulance;

Salvation Army of Providence emergency canteen vehicle;

Scituate Ambulance and Rescue Corps ambulances;

South County Ambulance Corps, Inc. (incorporated October 28, 1939, as a charitable corporation) ambulance;

South Foster Volunteer Fire Department No. 1 ambulances;

United States government motor vehicles;

United States government-accredited motor vehicles owned by a representative of a foreign country;

United States mail rural free delivery driver-owned vehicles. This exemption applies to the particular motor vehicle used in carrying that mail, and not to persons or concerns contracting to carry the United States mail. The words “United States mail” must be plainly printed on two (2) sides of that vehicle;

Veterans of Foreign Wars bloodmobile;

Veterans of Foreign Wars, Harold F. Flynn Post No. 263, Woonsocket ambulance;

Volunteer ambulance or rescue corps ambulance or rescue vehicle of a city or town used in transporting sick or injured patients;

Westerly Ambulance Corps boat-trailer;

Westerly Ambulance Corps crash-truck; and

Westerly Ambulance Corps ambulances.

Each owner may be required to pay the cost price of the number plates or markers required to be displayed on its vehicle.

History of Section.

P.L. 1940, ch. 862, § 1; P.L. 1950, ch. 2447, § 1; P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 14, § 3; P.L. 1951, ch. 2668, § 1; P.L. 1951, ch. 2681, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 2883, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 2933, § 1; P.L. 1954, ch. 3243, § 1; P.L. 1954, ch. 3326, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3455, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3625, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3646, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-6-6

; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 9, § 1; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 11, § 1; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 13, § 1; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 24, § 1; R.P.L. 1957, ch. 25, § 1; P.L. 1958, ch. 13, § 1; P.L. 1958, ch. 43, § 1; P.L. 1958, ch. 94, § 1; P.L. 1959, ch. 3, § 1; P.L. 1959, ch. 11, § 1; P.L. 1959, ch. 43, § 1; P.L. 1961, ch. 126, § 1; P.L. 1962, ch. 15, § 1; P.L. 1962, ch. 31, § 1; P.L. 1963, ch. 5, § 1; P.L. 1963, ch. 26, § 1; P.L. 1963, ch. 143, § 1; P.L. 1964, ch. 181, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 15, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 18, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 153, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 231, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 82, § 1; P.L. 1971, ch. 32, § 1; P.L. 1971, ch. 52, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 218, § 2; P.L. 1981, ch. 327, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 253, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 478, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 308, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 323, § 1.

31-6-7.
Motorized wheel chairs.

Any nonprofit charitable organization shall be forever exempt from the payment of any fee for the annual registration of a certain type of motor vehicle commonly known and described as a motorized wheel chair. Any person designated, in writing, by a nonprofit charitable organization who shall operate a motorized wheel chair shall be exempt from any license requirements and fee for the operation of it.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 14, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

31-6-7

.

31-6-8.
Disabled veterans.

Any veteran who has been honorably discharged from the service of the armed forces or the merchant marine of the United States in any of the wars or campaigns in which the United States has been engaged and who, while engaged in these wars or campaigns or as a result of engagement in these wars or campaigns, by reason of amputation, has lost one or both of his or her arms, hands, feet, or legs, or who, by reason of other permanent injury, has lost the use of one or both of his or her arms, hands, feet, or legs, or to whom has been granted a motor vehicle under chapter 870-2D, United States Public Laws 663, enacted 1946, 79th Congress, or has suitable documentation from the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs to establish that the veteran:

Has a combined service connected disability rating of one hundred percent (100%); or

Is considered “individually unemployable” due to his or her service-connected disability, shall be exempt from the payment of any fee for the annual registration of and a license to operate that motor vehicle.

The administrator for the division of motor vehicles shall issue to an eligible veteran for use on an automobile, or on a commercial vehicle having a gross weight of six thousand three hundred pounds (6,300 lbs.) or less, registration plates designated “Disabled Veteran.” Upon the death of the holder of “Disabled Veteran” plates, the plates may be transferred to his or her surviving spouse for his or her lifetime or until he or she remarries. Only one set of “Disabled Veteran” plates shall be issued to an eligible veteran and only after certification of eligibility from the Veterans’ Administration or other satisfactory documentation of eligibility is presented.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 14, § 4; P.L. 1952, ch. 2937, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

31-6-8

; P.L. 1993, ch. 134, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 537, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 119, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 224, § 1.

31-6-9.
Blind veterans.

Any veteran who has been honorably discharged from service with the armed forces or the merchant marine of the United States in any of the wars, declared or undeclared, in which the United States has been engaged and who, by reason of that service, has become totally blind, shall be further exempt from the payment of any fee for the annual registration of a pleasure motor vehicle owned by the veteran and operated for his or her pleasure and convenience. The veteran shall be entitled to display on that vehicle the special registration plates as shall be issued by the division of motor vehicles.

History of Section.

P.L. 1947, ch. 1844, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 2879, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-6-9

.

31-6-10.
Police vehicles — Fire apparatus — Trackless trolleys.

The following vehicles shall be exempt from registration:

Motor-propelled fire engines and other fire apparatus. However, the division of motor vehicles shall issue a permanent registration plate and certificate for each motor-propelled fire engine or fire apparatus for its life at no fee;

Every motor vehicle which is propelled by electric power obtained from overhead trolley wires but not operated upon rails.

Motor-propelled vehicles employed for law enforcement purposes by the several city and town police departments whether or not equipped with distinctive registration plates. A permanent registration plate and certificate shall, however, be issued for each motor-propelled police vehicle, for its life, at no fee. However, any existing police vehicle plate currently on a propelled police vehicle will pay a five dollar ($5.00) transfer fee if that plate is transferred to another police vehicle within the same police department.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 14, § 4; P.L. 1952, ch. 2937, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

31-6-10

; P.L. 1996, ch. 360, § 1.

31-6-11.
Transfer of registration.

The fee for transfer of registration shall be fifteen dollars ($15.00) if the vehicle to be registered is of the same fee-class as the original vehicle or less, but if the proper registration fee for the vehicle to be registered is greater than the amount of the fee paid for the original registration, the fee shall be fifteen dollars ($15.00) plus the difference in registration fees of the original vehicle and the vehicle to be registered.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 14, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

31-6-11

; P.L. 1960, ch. 75, § 6; P.L. 1981, ch. 327, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 29, § 1.

31-6-12.
Business and special license fees.

The following fees shall be collected by the division of motor vehicles:

For each license to deal in motor vehicles and for each branch office of a dealer, sixty dollars ($60.00).

For dealer registration number plates and a dealer certificate, thirty dollars ($30.00) if the dealer operates not more than three (3) motor vehicles, trailers, or semi-trailers at any one time, and ten dollars ($10.00) plus the cost of number plates for every motor vehicle, trailer, or semi-trailer in excess of three (3) motor vehicles, trailers, or semi-trailers.

For bailee registration number plates and a bailee certificate, thirty dollars ($30.00) if the bailee operates not more than three (3) motor vehicles, trailers, or semi-trailers at any one time, and ten dollars ($10.00) plus the cost of number plates for every motor vehicle, trailer, or semi-trailer in excess of three (3) motor vehicles, trailers, or semi-trailers.

For each manufacturer, factory branch, or factory representative license, five dollars ($5.00).

For each wrecker’s license, sixty dollars ($60.00).

For in-transit number plates and certificates, thirty dollars ($30.00) if the owner operates or moves not more than three (3) pieces of mobile equipment at any one time, and ten dollars ($10.00) plus the cost of number plates for every piece of mobile equipment in excess of three (3) pieces of mobile equipment.

For special use identification tags and special use certificates, ten dollars ($10.00).

For transporter registration number plates and a transporter certificate, thirty dollars ($30.00) if the transporter operates not more than three (3) motor vehicles, trailers, or semi-trailers at any one time, and ten dollars ($10.00) plus the cost of number plates for every motor vehicle, trailer, or semi-trailer in excess of three (3) motor vehicles, trailers or semi-trailers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 14, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

31-6-12

; P.L. 1959, ch. 123, § 3; P.L. 1960, ch. 33, § 2; P.L. 1960, ch. 75, § 6; P.L. 1966, ch. 187, § 6.

31-6-13.
Disposition of fees.

All fees collected under chapters 1 — 27 of this title shall be paid into the hands of the general treasurer to be credited to the general funds of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 14, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

31-6-13

.

31-6-14.
Return of rejected or erroneously collected fees.

Whenever any application to the division of motor vehicles is accompanied by any fee as required by law, and the application is refused or rejected, the fee shall be returned to the applicant.

Whenever the division of motor vehicles, through error collects any fee not required to be paid the fee shall be refunded to the person paying it upon application made within one year after the date of the payment. The one year period for refund may be extended at the discretion of the administrator of the division of motor vehicles.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 14, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

31-6-14

; P.L. 1989, ch. 49, § 1.

31-6-15.
Payment of fees by credit card. [Contingent effective date; see note.]

The division of motor vehicles may accept payment by credit card of all fees paid to the division of motor vehicles as provided by this chapter.

The division of motor vehicles shall determine which fees may be paid by credit card and the manner in which the payments may be made.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 364, § 1.